California statutes. Water Code
Revenue warrants may be made subject to redemption prior to their fixed maturity date upon such terms, conditions and notice, and at such times and prices, as the board may determine prior to the issuance of such warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36385.

Revenue warrants may be sold at either public or private sale upon such terms and conditions as the board may determine. Such warrants may be sold at less than their par or face value, but no revenue warrant may be sold at a price which would yield to the purchaser an average of more than 8 percent per annum, payable semiannually, according to standard tables of bond values.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36386.

No revenue warrants shall be issued or sold until their issuance has been authorized by resolution of the board adopted by a four-fifths vote.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

36386.1.

If, after the board adopts the resolution to issue the revenue warrants and before 30 days thereafter, the board receives a petition containing the signatures of persons holding title to 10 percent of the land area within the district, the board shall call an election of the qualified voters in the district and submit the resolution to issue revenue warrants to such voters for their approval or rejection. The election required by this section shall be called and noticed, held, and conducted in the same manner provided for bond elections in the district, excepting that a majority of the votes cast in favor of such resolution shall be required for the approval of such resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36387.

The board may determine the form and denomination of revenue warrants, the manner of their execution, their registration and exchange privileges and the place or places of their payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36388.

The board, in a resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue warrants, may provide for special funds for the deposit and application of the proceeds of the warrants and for the deposit and application of revenues pledged to secure their payment. The board may provide for the establishment of a reserve fund from the proceeds of the revenue warrants or revenues pledged to their payment. The board may appoint a fiscal agent to hold any or all such funds in trust for the holders of revenue warrants and for the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36389.

The board, in a resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue warrants, may covenant to operate and maintain the facilities producing the revenues pledged for the security of the revenue warrants, may covenant to fix, maintain, and collect tolls, charges, rates, or fees which will produce revenues sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of and interest on the revenue warrants and to provide such additional sums for the further security of the revenue warrants as the resolution may prescribe, and may make such other covenants, with respect to insurance, investments of funds, accounting records, independent audits, events of default, limitations upon competitive facilities, and any other matters relating to the revenue warrants and their security as the board may deem necessary, convenient, or desirable in order better to secure the revenue warrants or to make them more marketable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36390.

The board, in a resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue warrants, may provide for paying the interest on the revenue warrants for a period of not more than one year out of the proceeds of the sale thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36391.

Except as otherwise provided in any resolution authorizing the issuance of revenue warrants, the holder of any revenue warrant may by mandamus, or other appropriate proceeding, require and compel the performance of any of the duties imposed upon the board, or upon any officer or employee of the district, in connection with the collection, deposit, investment, application, or disbursement of any revenues pledged for the security of the revenue warrants, or in connection with the deposit, investment, or disbursement of the proceeds received from the sale of the revenue warrants, or in connection with any covenants contained in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue warrants. The enumeration of such rights and remedies does not, however, exclude the exercise or prosecution of any other rights or remedies available to the holders of revenue warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36392.

Revenue warrants shall not be issued under this chapter by any district in any one fiscal year in excess of four million dollars ($4,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

36393.

The provisions of this chapter shall constitute an addition to all other power of a district to borrow money, incur indebtedness, and issue warrants in connection therewith, and shall not be deemed a restriction or limitation on such other power.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Provisions Relating to Short Term Borrowings [36400. - 36409.]

36400.

A district may borrow money and incur indebtedness as provided in this chapter by action of the board and without the necessity of calling and holding an election in the district, except as otherwise provided in Section 36402.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 164.)
-------------------------------------------

36401.

Indebtedness may be incurred pursuant to this chapter for any purpose for which the district is authorized to expend funds, including provisions for the payment of current expenses of the district and for the funding or refunding of any outstanding warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36402.

Indebtedness incurred under this chapter shall be evidenced by warrants or negotiable notes of the district payable at stated times fixed by the board and bearing interest at a rate not exceeding 8 percent per annum, payable annually or semiannually.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

36402.1.

Except as provided in Section 36407.1, no warrants or negotiable notes issued pursuant to this chapter shall be valid unless their issuance is authorized by a majority of the voters voting at an election called by the board for the purpose of determining whether or not the warrants or negotiable notes shall be authorized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

36402.2.

Notice of the election shall be given and the election shall be held and the result determined as nearly as practicable in the manner provided for bond elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 164.)
-------------------------------------------

36402.3.

The proceeds of such warrants or negotiable notes may be used and applied to the purchase or redemption of any outstanding warrants or negotiable notes of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

36403.

Such warrants shall be issued in the name of the district after the adoption, by a four-fifths vote of all the members of the board, of a resolution setting forth the form of the warrant, the maturity date or dates thereof, and the manner of execution thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36404.

The board may, in its resolution authorizing the issuance of such warrants, provide that the warrants shall be subject to call and redemption prior to maturity, at the option of the district, at such price or prices as may be fixed in the resolution, not exceeding a premium of 6 percent of the par value of the warrants so subject to redemption. The resolution shall fix the method of giving notice of redemption to the holders of warrants to be redeemed and the price or prices at which the warrants shall be subject to redemption. Warrants so subject to call and redemption prior to maturity shall contain a recital to that effect on their face, and no warrant issued under this chapter shall be subject to call or redemption prior to its fixed maturity date unless it contains such recital.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36405.

Coupons payable to bearer shall be in a form and signed as prescribed by the board and may be attached to warrants issued under this chapter to evidence their interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

36406.

Warrants or negotiable notes issued under this chapter shall be offered for public sale upon notice inviting sealed bids therefor. Such notice shall be given by publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district or if such a newspaper is not printed and published in the district by posting in three public places in the district, and the sale shall not be held before 10 days after such publication or posting. The board may reject all bids received on public sale and either readvertise or sell the warrants or negotiable notes at private sale, but no sale at private sale shall be made for less than the par value of the warrants or negotiable notes and accrued interest thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

36407.

Warrants or negotiable notes issued under this chapter and authorized by the voters pursuant to Section 36402.1 shall constitute general obligations of the district for the payment of both principal and interest of which all land in the district subject to assessment by the district shall be assessed without limitation of rate or amount. It shall be the duty of the board to include in its annual estimate filed with the board of supervisors all sums necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, all warrants or negotiable notes issued under this chapter coming due during the next year, and any sums that the board shall direct to be set aside in a special fund for the future payment of principal of and interest on any outstanding warrants or negotiable notes issued under this chapter which will come due in any year following the next year. It shall be the duty of the board of supervisors, at the time and in the manner provided in this division for making the annual assessment, to fix an ad valorem rate of assessment sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on all warrants or negotiable notes issued under this chapter as the same become due, and the sums required for the special fund established by the board. Such ad valorem assessment shall be in addition to all other assessments in this division provided for and when collected shall be used for no purpose other than the payment of said warrants or negotiable notes and the interest thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

36407.1.

Warrants or negotiable notes payable in five years or less from the date of issuance may be issued under this section without the approval of the voters pursuant to Section 36402.1 and shall constitute obligations of the district payable from annual assessments and other revenues of the district and subject to the maximum property tax rate contained in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2201) of Part 4 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

36408.4.

Warrants or negotiable notes payable at a future date or times may also be issued to obtain funds or property for any lawful purpose of the district; provided, the total amount of the warrants or negotiable notes payable in any one year shall not exceed one-fourth of one (1) percent of the total valuation of the land in the district according to the last equalized assessment roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

36408.5.

Any warrant or negotiable notes authorized in the preceding section shall draw interest at a rate to be fixed by the board not to exceed eight (8) percent per year payable annually or semiannually as the board may prescribe. Negotiable notes shall be issued payable to bearer with a right of the district to provide for the registration and deregistration thereof in the same manner as bonds of the district. Interest coupons to bearer in a form and signed as prescribed by the board may be attached to such warrants or negotiable notes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

36408.6.

Warrants or negotiable notes of any district may be issued to evidence the indebtedness allowed to be incurred prior to the levy of the first district assessment, bearing interest fixed by the board at not more than eight (8) percent per year. These warrants or negotiable notes shall be made payable on a date not later than the first day of July next after the first annual assessment in the district is levied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

36408.7.

A district may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of, but not in excess of the principal amount of, authorized bonds of the district which have not yet been sold and delivered, and for that purpose may issue and sell negotiable bond anticipation notes, and may refund such notes from time to time, but the maximum maturity of any such notes, as originally issued or as refunded, shall not exceed five years from the date of the original notes. The notes shall be sold in such manner as the board may determine, and such notes and the resolution providing for the issuance of such notes may contain any provision, condition or limitation which a bond, or any resolution or ordinance providing for the issuance of bonds, may contain. The interest on bond anticipation notes shall be payable at the time or times provided in such notes and may be represented by interest coupons attached to the notes and shall be payable from the same funds from which the interest on bonds of the district are payable. The principal of such notes may be paid from any moneys of the district available for such purpose. If such notes, or any portion thereof, have not been previously paid, they shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of bonds in anticipation of which the notes were issued. The resolution providing for the issuance of bond anticipation notes may contain a provision that, if for any reason bonds of the district are not sold in time to provide funds to pay any unpaid note, and, if other funds of the district are not available for such payment, ad valorem assessments shall be levied upon the assessable land in the district for such payment in the same manner provided for the payment of bonds in such amount each year for such period of years as may be set forth in such resolution. To the extent bond anticipation notes are paid from such assessment, authorized bonds in a corresponding amount shall be canceled and not issued thereafter. When bonds of the district are issued and any portion of the proceeds of the sale are to be used to pay bond anticipation notes, such bonds shall mature not later than the maximum permissible years for such bonds as provided in Section 36195, with the maximum permissible maturity determined from the date of such notes as originally issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

36408.8.

A district may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of, but not in excess of the principal amount of, authorized bonds of an improvement district formed pursuant to this division which have not yet been sold and delivered, and for that purpose may issue and sell negotiable bond anticipation notes, and may refund such notes from time to time, but the maximum maturity of any such notes, as originally issued or as refunded, shall not exceed five years from the date of the original notes. The notes shall be sold in such manner as the board may determine, and such notes and the resolution providing for the issuance of such notes may contain any provision, condition or limitation which a bond, or any resolution or ordinance providing for the issuance of bonds, may contain. The interest on bond anticipation notes shall be payable at the time or times provided in such notes and may be represented by interest coupons attached to the notes and shall be payable from the same funds from which the interest on bonds of the improvement district are payable. The principal of such notes may be paid from any moneys of the improvement district available for such purpose. If such notes, or any portion thereof, have not been previously paid, they shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of bonds in anticipation of which the notes were issued. The resolution providing for the issuance of bond anticipation notes may contain a provision that, if for any reason bonds of the improvement district are not sold in time to provide funds to pay any unpaid note, and, if other funds of the improvement district are not available for such payment, ad valorem assessments shall be levied upon the assessable land in the improvement district for such payment in the same manner provided for the payment of bonds in such amount each year for such period of years as may be set forth in such resolution. To the extent bond anticipation notes are paid from such assessments, authorized bonds in a corresponding amount shall be canceled and not issued thereafter. When bonds of the improvement district are issued and any portion of the proceeds of the sale are to be used to pay bond anticipation notes, such bonds shall mature not later than the maximum permissible years for such bonds as provided in Section 36195, with the maximum permissible maturity determined from the date of such notes as originally issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

36409.

The provisions of this chapter shall constitute an addition to all other power of the district to borrow money, incur indebtedness, and issue warrants or negotiable notes in connection therewith, and shall not be deemed a restriction or limitation on such other power. A district may issue negotiable notes as provided in this chapter in lieu of the issuance of warrants of the district or for an improvement district as provided in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.9. Alternative Provisions for the Formation of Improvement Districts and the Issuance of Bonds Therefor [36410. - 36446.]

36410.

This chapter provides an alternative method for the formation of improvement districts consisting of a portion of the territory within a district and the issuance of bonds and warrants of said district for said improvement districts. This chapter shall not apply to or affect any other provisions of this division for the formation of improvement districts or the incurring of indebtedness therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1085.)
-------------------------------------------

36411.

Improvement districts consisting of contiguous or noncontiguous portions of the territory of a district may be formed within a district and bonds and warrants of the district may be issued for such improvement districts as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1085.)
-------------------------------------------

36412.

Bonds and warrants of a district for an improvement district may be issued for any purpose for which bonds and warrants of the district may be issued; provided, that the carrying out of such purpose shall benefit the lands within such improvement district. Such bonds or warrants may be either general obligation bonds or warrants or revenue bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 14.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36413.

Whenever the board is of the opinion that an improvement district should be formed, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution of intention which shall state: (a) the intention of the board to form the proposed improvement district, (b) the purpose for which the proposed improvement district is to be formed, (c) the estimated expense of carrying out said purpose, (d) if assessments are to be levied for carrying out such purpose, such assessments shall be levied exclusively upon the lands in said proposed improvement district, (e) if revenue bonds are to be used for carrying out such purpose, only the revenues derived from the operation of improvement district works shall be pledged to the payment of principal and interest on such bonds, and no tax or assessment shall ever be levied or collected to pay principal or interest on such bonds, (f) that a map showing the exterior boundaries of said proposed improvement district, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the proposed improvement district, is on file with the secretary of the district and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested, (g) the time and place for a hearing by the board on the formation of said proposed improvement district, the extent thereof, the purpose for which it is to be formed, the benefit to lands within the proposed improvement district from carrying out said purpose, the estimated expense of carrying out said purpose or any other matter relating to any of the foregoing, which hearing may be held concurrently with the hearing required by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 35950) of this part, and (h) that at said time and place any persons interested, including all persons owning lands in the district or in the proposed improvement district, may appear and be heard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 15.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36414.

Notice of said hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution of intention in a newspaper of general circulation published in each affected county, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the first publication to be at least fourteen (14) days prior to the time fixed for the hearing. Said notice shall also be given by posting a copy of said resolution in three public places within the proposed improvement district for at least fourteen (14) days prior to the time fixed for said hearing. No notice other than that required by this section need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

36415.

At the time and place so fixed, or at any time or place to which the hearing is continued, the board shall hold the hearing provided for by said resolution of intention, at which hearing any person interested, including all persons owning land in the district, or in the proposed improvement district, may appear and be heard concerning any matters set forth in the resolution of intention or any matters material thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

36416.

At the hearing the board may adopt a resolution proposing modifications relating to any or all of the following: (a) a modification of the boundaries of the proposed improvement district, (b) the addition to the proposed improvement district of lands which in its opinion will be benefited by carrying out the purpose described in the resolution of intention, (c) the exclusion from the proposed improvement district of any lands described in the resolution of intention which in its opinion will not be benefited by carrying out said purpose or (d) the increasing, decreasing or otherwise modifying of the purpose stated in the resolution of intention. Said resolution proposing modification shall describe the proposed modifications, state the change, if any, in the estimated expense of carrying out the purpose, and shall fix a time and place for hearing by the board thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

36417.

The board shall not order any modifications except after publication of the resolution proposing said modifications once in the same newspaper in which the resolution of intention was published, said publication to be at least fourteen (14) days prior to the date of hearing on said proposed modifications.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

36418.

The hearing on any proposed modifications, or any continuance thereof, may be held at the same time and place as any continued hearing on the resolution of intention and both said hearings may be held and conducted concurrently.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

36419.

At the conclusion of the hearing on the resolution of intention and of the hearing, if any, upon proposed modifications, the board may by resolution order the improvement district formed for the purpose and with the exterior boundaries described in the resolution of intention, or for the purpose and with the exterior boundaries as proposed to be modified in the resolution, if any, proposing modifications. Said resolution ordering the district formed shall state the estimated expense of carrying out the purpose described therein. Said resolution shall also number and designate said improvement district substantially as “Improvement District No. ____ of ____ District.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

36420.

(a) After adopting the resolution ordering the improvement district formed, the board may provide for and call a special bond election within such improvement district to submit to the voters of the improvement district a proposition of whether or not an indebtedness of the district shall be incurred and bonds issued therefor in an amount not exceeding the estimate stated in the resolution ordering the improvement district formed.

(b) If such bonds are to be general obligation bonds, such indebtedness and the bonds shall be payable from assessments to be levied and collected upon lands within said improvement district.

(c) If such bonds are to be revenue bonds only revenues derived from the operation of the improvement district works shall be pledged to the payment or redemption thereof and the payment of interest thereon, and such revenue bonds shall not be a general debt liability or obligation of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 16.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36421.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, special bond elections within an improvement district shall be called, noticed, held, conducted and the results thereof canvassed in substantially the same manner as is provided in this division for bond elections held in the entire district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 17.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36423.

Bonds of said district for said improvement district shall be issued and sold in substantially the same manner and upon the same terms and conditions as bonds of the entire district, except that (a) if such bonds are general obligation bonds of the district for such improvement district, assessments for the payment of said bonds and the interest thereon shall be levied and collected from annual assessments to be levied upon and collected from lands within said improvement district or (b) if such bonds are revenue bonds, only the net revenues of the improvement district shall be pledged to the payment or redemption thereof and the payment of interest thereon. The bonds shall be issued in the name of the district and, if general obligation bonds, shall be designated “Bonds of ____ District for Improvement District No. ____” and each bond and all interest coupons shall state that the assessment for the payment thereof shall be limited to annual assessments to be levied upon and collected from the lands within said improvement district, except to the extent that provision for such payment has been made by the board, as may be permitted by law or, if revenue bonds, shall be designated “Revenue Bonds of ____ District for Improvement District No. ____” and each bond and all interest coupons shall state that it is payable from revenues of the improvement district, except to the extent that provision for such payment has been otherwise made by the board, as may be permitted by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 19.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36424.

Except to the extent that provision has otherwise been made by the board, as may be permitted by law, for the payment of the principal of and interest upon general obligation bonds and warrants of said district for such improvement district as they become due and also for the payment of operating expenses of said improvement district, the annual estimate made by the board of the sum required by the district to discharge all of its obligations shall, in addition to the other amounts required to be included therein, include an amount sufficient to pay the principal of general obligation bonds and warrants of the district for said improvement district and the interest thereon as the same becomes due and also to pay operating expenses for said improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 20.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36424.1.

(a) This section applies only to the Santa Margarita Water District.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(1) In 1978, the voters of the Santa Margarita Water District authorized the sale of bonds for its improvement district number four in which the bond proceeds are available for water and sewer facilities.

(2) In 1998, the Capistrano School District created a Mello-Roos Community Facilities District in which the bond proceeds are available for water, sewer, roads, and other facilities for a portion of the area to be served by the improvement district.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature to allow the Santa Margarita Water District the flexibility to establish equity with regard to the manner in which the district’s water and sewer bonds are repaid, recognizing that a portion of the water and sewer facilities for the improvement district area will be financed by bonds issued pursuant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Ch. 2.5 (commencing with Sec. 53311), Pt. 1, Div. 2, Title 5, Gov. C.), instead of all water and sewer facilities being financed by the district’s water and sewer bonds.

(d) For the purpose of making the annual estimate of the amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, general obligation bonds of the Santa Margarita Water District for improvement district number four pursuant to Section 36424, the board of the district may designate two separate areas within the improvement district, with one area financed by the school district’s bonds under Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code and the other area not so financed.

(e) If the district exercises the authority authorized by this section, the amount of principal and interest allocated each year to the area without the bonds issued under Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code (1) shall not be less, to the extent possible, than the amount needed to repay the principal and interest actually owed on the water and sewer bonds if that amount is spread uniformly across all of the assessed value of property within the improvement district, and (2) shall not be more, to the extent possible, than that amount that would have been allocated if (A) all water and sewer facilities had been financed by the water district’s water and sewer bonds, subject to a limit of the amount of water and sewer bonds actually authorized, and (B) the entire improvement district was responsible to repay these amounts.

(f) The board shall not designate separate areas unless it receives a report from an independent financial consultant or engineer that the designation of the proposed areas and the allocation of the estimated amount required to repay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds to the areas, in accordance with subdivision (e), will not adversely affect the board’s ability to levy ad valorem assessments that will be sufficient to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds and the board determines that the designation of the areas and the allocation of the amount will not be adverse to the interests of the holders of the bonds. Notwithstanding subdivision (e), if the report indicates that the allocation described in subdivision (e) will adversely affect the board’s ability to levy ad valorem assessments that are sufficient to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds or that that allocation may be adverse to the interests of the holders of the bonds, the district may designate two separate areas within improvement district number four in accordance with subdivision (d) and levy ad valorem assessments in amounts necessary to avoid those adverse effects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 25, Sec. 1.   Effective May 24, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

36425.

In addition to the charges authorized to be fixed and collected pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 35470) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of this division, the board in lieu, in whole or in part, of raising money for the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds and warrants of the district issued for an improvement district or for the operating expenses of that improvement district, may fix and collect charges for the making of water available to the holders of title to land in that improvement district or the occupants thereon. The additional charges within an improvement district shall be fixed and collected in substantially the same manner and upon the same terms and conditions as is provided in Article 4 for charges to be fixed and collected within the entire district, except that the additional charges fixed and collected from an improvement district shall be expended only for the payment of the principal of, and interest upon, bonds and warrants of the district issued for the improvement district or for payment of the operating expenses of the improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 188.)
-------------------------------------------

36426.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of this division applicable to bonds and warrants of the district and assessments therefor shall, so far as consistent with this chapter, apply to bonds and warrants of the district for improvement districts therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 21.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36427.

If general obligation bonds of the district for an improvement district thereof shall have been issued, the treasurer shall establish within the general obligation bond fund for the district provided for in Section 35902 a separate account for general obligation bonds of the district for each improvement district to which shall be apportioned such portion of the general obligation bond fund as is applicable to the general obligation bonds of the district for the particular improvement district. The money in any separate account shall be used for the payment of the general obligation bonds of the district for the particular improvement district and interest thereon and until the general obligation bonded indebtedness of the district therefor is discharged shall not be used for any other purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 22.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36428.

After the formation of an improvement district additional lands contiguous or noncontiguous thereto may be included therein upon such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the board. If the board is of the opinion that territory should be added to an improvement district, the board shall adopt a resolution of intention which shall state:

(a) The intention of the board to add certain territory to Improvement District No. ____ of ____ District;

(b) That a map showing the exterior boundaries of the territory to be annexed, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the area to be annexed, is on file with the secretary of the district and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested;

(c) The terms and conditions of annexation, if any;

(d) If assessments will be levied for carrying out any purpose of said improvement district including the payment of principal of and interest on any general obligation bonds or warrants outstanding, such assessments shall be levied exclusively upon the lands in said proposed improvement district including the territory annexed thereto;

(e) If revenues are to be used for carrying out any purpose of such improvement district, including the payment of principal of and interest on any revenue bonds outstanding, such revenues shall be limited to revenues derived from the operation of the improvement district works, including the territory annexed thereto.

(f) The time and place for hearing by the board on the question of the annexation of said territory to said improvement district and any other matter relating to any of the foregoing; and

(g) That at said time and place any persons interested including persons owning land within the area to be annexed to the improvement district may appear and be heard. Notice of said hearing shall be given in the same manner as provided in Section 36414.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 23.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

36429.

At the time and place fixed or at any time and place to which the hearing is continued, the board shall hold the hearing provided for by said resolution of intention at which hearing any person interested, including all persons owning land in the district or in the territory to be annexed to the improvement district, may appear and be heard concerning any matters set forth in the resolution of intention or any matters material thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

36430.

At the hearing the board may adopt a resolution proposing modifications relating to any or all of the following:

(a) Modification of the boundaries of the territory to be annexed;

(b) The addition to the territory proposed to be annexed of lands of which in its opinion will be benefited by being annexed to said improvement district;
